Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6561YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 2573 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.232 Mechanical insulation energy 1 savings program. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âApplicantâ means a school district, public hospital, 5 public housing building, or political subdivision with a 6 building of at least twenty thousand square feet that may 7 require mechanical insulation upgrades. 8 b. âMechanical insulationâ means insulation materials, 9 facings, and accessory products used for thermal requirements 10 for mechanical piping and equipment, hot and cold applications, 11 heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning applications. 12 c. âQualified auditâ means a mechanical insulation audit of 13 a building provided by a qualified contractor at no cost to the 14 authority or an applicant, which identifies missing, damaged, 15 or improperly installed mechanical insulation. A âqualified 16 auditâ includes an estimate of installation costs and estimated 17 energy and cost savings. 18 d. âQualified contractorâ means an insulation contractor 19 who has entered into an apprenticeship agreement as defined 20 in section 84D.2, that is appropriate for the type and 21 scope of work to be performed, including the ability to 22 meet the American society of heating, refrigerating, and 23 air-conditioning engineers energy standard for buildings except 24 low-rise residential buildings. 25 e. âQualified mechanical insulation expendituresâ means 26 the purchase of insulation materials, facings, and accessory 27 products used for thermal requirements for mechanical piping 28 and equipment, hot and cold applications, and heating, 29 ventilation, and air-conditioning applications. âQualified 30 mechanical insulation expendituresâ includes all associated 31 labor costs properly allocable to on-site preparation, 32 assembly, and original installation performed by a qualified 33 contractor. 34 2. Contingent on a specific appropriation for this purpose, 35 -1- LSB 6561YH (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2573 the authority shall establish and administer a mechanical 1 insulation energy savings program for the purpose of providing 2 grants to applicants for qualified mechanical insulation 3 expenditures. 4 3. a. The authority shall a establish process by rule for 5 an applicant to request a qualified audit. If a request for 6 a qualified audit is approved by the authority, the applicant 7 shall receive a qualified audit at no cost. 8 b. After an applicantâs qualified audit is completed, the 9 authority shall award a grant to the applicant in an amount 10 equal to, and for the purpose of paying, the entire cost of the 11 applicantâs qualified mechanical insulation expenditures. 12 4. The authority shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 13 to administer this section. 14